Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-606
Sale of school
bus; alteration required; violation; penalty.

When
any vehicle with a manufacturer's rated seating capacity of eleven or more
passengers used for transportation of students is sold and used
for any other purpose than for transportation of students, such vehicle shall be painted a distinct
color other than that prescribed by the State Board of Education and the stop
arms and system of alternately flashing warning signal lights on such vehicle
shall be removed. It shall be the purchaser's responsibility to see that the
modifications required by this section are made. Any person violating this
section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof,
be fined not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than one hundred dollars.

Laws 1963, c. 459, § 1, p. 1487;

Laws 1971, LB 292, § 12;

Laws 1974, LB 863, § 10;

Laws 1981, LB 316, § 2;

Laws 1988, LB 1142, § 5;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-488.05;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 367;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 23.